Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-805
Apartment; form of ownership.

Any apartment may be held and owned by more than one person as joint tenants, as tenants in common, or in any other real estate tenancy relationship recognized under the laws of this state.

Laws 1963, c. 429, § 5, p. 1438.